dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/venetan.aff
FLAG long
SFX N1 ar erées/I3 ar	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + r[èé]e, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 ar erèe/I3 ar	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + r[èé]e, ŧenedexe, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 ar erèes/I3 ar	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + r[èé]e, ŧenedexe, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 ò ee/I3 erò	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + r[èé]e
SFX N1 ò ées/I3 erò	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + r[èé]e
SFX N1 ò èe/I3 erò	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + r[èé]e, ŧenedexe
SFX N1 ò èes/I3 erò	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + r[èé]e, ŧenedexe
SFX N1 ir eree/I3 ir	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + r[èé]e, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 ir erées/I3 ir	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + r[èé]e, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 ir erèe/I3 ir	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + r[èé]e, ŧenedexe, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 ir erèes/I3 ir	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + r[èé]e, ŧenedexe, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 0 íe [aei]r	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + rí[ae]
SFX N1 ar eríe ar	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + rí[ae], metaplaxmo
SFX N1 ò íe erò	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + rí[ae]
SFX N1 0 ee [aei]r	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + r[èé]e
SFX N1 ar eree ar	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + r[èé]e, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 0 èe [aei]r	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + r[èé]e, ŧenedexe
SFX N1 ar erèe ar	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + r[èé]e, ŧenedexe, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 ò ee erò	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + r[èé]e
SFX N1 ir eree ir	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + r[èé]e, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 ò èe erò	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + r[èé]e, ŧenedexe
SFX N1 ir erèe ir	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + r[èé]e, ŧenedexe, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 0 ove [aei]r	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX N1 ar erove ar	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + ró(v)e, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 ò ove erò	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX N1 ir erove ir	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + ró(v)e, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 0 oe [aei]r	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX N1 ar eroe ar	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + ró(v)e, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 ò oe erò	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX N1 ir eroe ir	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + ró(v)e, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 0 ove [aei]r	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX N1 ar erove ar	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + ró(v)e, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 ò ove erò	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX N1 ir erove ir	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + ró(v)e, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 0 oe [aei]r	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX N1 ar eroe ar	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + ró(v)e, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 ò oe erò	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX N1 ir eroe ir	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + ró(v)e, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 0 ove [aei]r	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX N1 ar erove ar	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + ró(v)e, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 ò ove erò	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX N1 ir erove ir	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + ró(v)e, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 0 oe [aei]r	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX N1 ar eroe ar	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + ró(v)e, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 ò oe erò	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX N1 ir eroe ir	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + ró(v)e, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 0 ove [aei]r	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX N1 ar erove ar	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + ró(v)e, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 ò ove erò	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX N1 ir erove ir	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + ró(v)e, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 0 oe [aei]r	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX N1 ar eroe ar	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + ró(v)e, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 ò oe erò	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX N1 ir eroe ir	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + ró(v)e, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 0 ove/I5 [aei]r	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX N1 ar erove/I5 ar	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + ró(v)e, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 ò ove/I5 erò	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX N1 ir erove/I5 ir	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + ró(v)e, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 0 oe/I5 [aei]r	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX N1 ar eroe/I5 ar	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + ró(v)e, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 ò oe/I5 erò	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX N1 ir eroe/I5 ir	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + ró(v)e, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 0 ee/I1 [aei]r	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + r[èé]e
SFX N1 ar eree/I1 ar	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + r[èé]e, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 0 èe/I1 [aei]r	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + r[èé]e, ŧenedexe
SFX N1 ar erèe/I1 ar	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + r[èé]e, ŧenedexe, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 ò ee/I1 erò	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + r[èé]e
SFX N1 ir eree/I1 ir	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + r[èé]e, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 ò èe/I1 erò	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + r[èé]e, ŧenedexe
SFX N1 ir erèe/I1 ir	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + r[èé]e, ŧenedexe, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 0 íe [aei]r	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + rí[ae]
SFX N1 ar eríe ar	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + rí[ae], metaplaxmo
SFX N1 ò íe erò	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + rí[ae]
SFX N1 0 ié/I4 [aei]r	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + r(is)ié, baso belumat, seguxinexe, cipileño
SFX N1 ar erié/I4 ar	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + r(is)ié, baso belumat, seguxinexe, cipileño, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 ò ié/I4 erò	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + r(is)ié, baso belumat, seguxinexe, cipileño
SFX N1 0 isié/I4 [aei]r	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + r(is)ié, baso belumat, seguxinexe, cipileño
SFX N1 ar erisié/I4 ar	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + r(is)ié, baso belumat, seguxinexe, cipileño, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 ò isié/I4 erò	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + r(is)ié, baso belumat, seguxinexe, cipileño
SFX N1 0 ou [aei]r	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + róu
SFX N1 ar erou ar	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + róu, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 ò ou erò	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + róu
SFX N1 ir erou ir	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + róu, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 0 ou [aei]r	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + róu
SFX N1 ar erou ar	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + róu, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 ò ou erò	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + róu
SFX N1 ir erou ir	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + róu, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 0 ou [aei]r	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + róu
SFX N1 ar erou ar	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + róu, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 ò ou erò	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + róu
SFX N1 ir erou ir	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + róu, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 0 ou [aei]r	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + róu
SFX N1 ar erou ar	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + róu, metaplaxmo
SFX N1 ò ou erò	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + róu
SFX N1 ir erou ir	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + róu, metaplaxmo
