dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/venetan.dic
exanemar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:ex
axiar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
xbaporar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:s
bekonar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
bikokar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
bonasar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2@0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
xbraxar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2+0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:s
xburfar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:s
cuconar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
intredixerò/T0T1T2T3T6N0N1N2N3N4N6L1L2L3L5l1l2l3l5W3w3	po:verb vt:indicative+future is:first is:singular st:intredíxer dp:inter
đafranar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3W1P0P1+0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
xirar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2.0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
ebrear/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
antefaxerò/T0T1T2T3T6N0N1N2N3N4N6L1L2L3L5l1l2l3l5W3w3	po:verb vt:indicative+future is:first is:singular st:antefàxer dp:ante
skarnifegar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:karne dp:s
fiaskeɉar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
fodrar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2-1+0*0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
frapolar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3W1P0P1+0*0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
profumar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2*0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
gargariđar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3W1P0P1*0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
gracar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
xgriñaŧar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3W1P0P1	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:s
ingurxitar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:in
jeskolar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3W1P0P1Vp	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
kalamitar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3W1P0P1	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
kapir/T0T1T2T3T4N1N2N4N5L1L2L3L4l1l2l3l4W0W1P0P1P2^6	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
skatiɉar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2-0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:s
koertar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2-1.0*0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
kostonar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
rekuxar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:re
interlinear/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:inter
romanir/T0T1T2T3T4N1N2N4N5L1L2L3L4l1l2l3l4W0W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:re
rexmesedar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2-1	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:s dp:re
xnaređar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3W1P0P1	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:s
dex-onestar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
sparonsonar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
pestiŧar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3W1P0P1	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
esplisitar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:ex
prosimar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2@0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
roexar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
scopetar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
skarabotar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple lg:lombard
sparniđar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3W1P0P1	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
stramar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
intarsiar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:in
tonixar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
ŧankar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3W1P0P1+0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
ŧiđar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3W1P0P1.0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
vagejar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
xvergoñaŧar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3W1P0P1	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:s
voltolar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3W1P0P1+0.0*0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
